Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB359.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "project" and "project costs" in section 3 of the act of July 11, 1990 (P.L.465, No.113), known as the Tax Increment Financing Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Anti-displacement activity." Projects, programs and operations that prevent or compensate for the effects of involuntary relocation of a resident or business from the resident's or business's current location where the resident or business otherwise would want to remain if not for socioeconomic and environmental pressures that make staying infeasible or undesirable."Area of impact." The term includes the area of the project and the proximate surrounding area as outlined in the project plan approved by the governing body.* * *"Project." The undertakings and activities of an authority in a tax increment district for the elimination and prevention of the development or spread of blight, which may include property acquisition, clearance, redevelopment, rehabilitation or conservation in a tax increment district, or a combination or part thereof in accordance with a project plan. The term includes anti-displacement activities in the tax increment district and area of impact, as described in the project plan."Project costs." Any expenditures made or estimated to be made or monetary obligations incurred or estimated to be incurred which are listed in a project plan as costs of public works or improvements or residential, commercial or industrial development or revitalization or anti-displacement activities within a tax increment district, plus any costs incidental thereto. Project costs include, but are not limited to:(1) Capital costs, including the actual costs of the construction of public works or improvements or residential, commercial or industrial development or revitalization, new 20250HB0359PN1582 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 buildings, structures and fixtures; the demolition, alteration, remodeling, repair or reconstruction of existing buildings, structures and fixtures; the acquisition, upgrade or rehabilitation of machinery and equipment; and the acquisition, clearing and grading of land. Capital costs also include the actual cost of the construction, rehabilitation or repair of publicly owned infrastructure improvements located outside the boundaries of a tax increment district which are of direct benefit to a project.(2) Financing costs, including all costs of issuance of tax increment bonds or notes, reserve funds for tax increment bonds or notes, all interest paid to holders of evidences of indebtedness issued to pay for project costs, and any premium paid over the principal amount thereof because of the redemption of such obligations prior to maturity.(3) Real property assembly costs, meaning any deficit incurred resulting from the sale or lease as lessor by the authority of real property within a tax increment district for consideration which is less than its cost to the authority.(4) Professional service costs, including those costs incurred for architectural, planning, engineering and legal advice and services.(5) Administrative costs, including reasonable charges for the time spent by employees of a municipality or an authority in connection with the implementation of a project plan.(6) Relocation [costs.] and anti-displacement activity costs. Anti-displacement activity costs also include the area of impact as described in the project plan.20250HB0359PN1582 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Organizational costs, including the costs of conducting environmental impact and other studies and the costs of informing the public with respect to the creation of tax increment districts and the implementation of project plans.(8) Costs which are found to be necessary or convenient to the creation of tax increment districts or the implementation of project plans, OR FOR THE FUNDING OF A REDEVELOPMENT FUND AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 4(6) or for the reimbursement of prior expenditures made for any of the costs under this definition.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 4 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 4. POWERS OF AUTHORITIES.IN ADDITION TO ALL OTHER POWERS CONFERRED BY LAW, AN AUTHORITY MAY EXERCISE ANY POWERS NECESSARY AND CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT, INCLUDING THE POWER TO:* * *(6) ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS WITH MUNICIPALITIES AND SCHOOL DISTRICTS FOR THE CREATION OF A REDEVELOPMENT FUND TO BE USED TO FURTHER THE PURPOSES OF THE AUTHORITY, TO BE FUNDED THROUGH THE ALLOCATION OF TAX INCREMENTS BOTH DURING THE EXISTENCE OF A TAX INCREMENT DISTRICT AND AFTER THE DISTRICT HAS TERMINATED.Section 2 3. Sections 5(a)(4)(i) and (6)(i) and (ii) and 9(d) of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Creation of tax increment districts and approval of project plans.(a) General rule.--A tax increment district shall be created 20250HB0359PN1582 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the following manner:* * *(4) The authority shall prepare a project plan for each tax increment district and submit the plan to the governing body of the municipality which will create the district and to the governing body of any other municipality or school district that levies property taxes within the boundaries of the proposed district. The plan shall include the following:(i) A statement listing the kind, number and location of all proposed public works or improvements and/or all residential, commercial or industrial development and revitalization improvements and anti-displacement activities.* * *(6) In order to create a district and adopt a project plan, the governing body of the municipality which will create the tax increment district shall adopt, not earlier than three weeks after the public hearing described in paragraph (5) has been held, a resolution or ordinance which:(i) Describes the boundaries of a tax increment district with sufficient definiteness to identify with ordinary and reasonable certainty the territory included. The governing body shall take care that the boundaries include only those whole units of property assessed for general property tax purposes. The governing body shall also describe any area of impact outside the district where anti-displacement activities may occur.(ii) Creates the district as of a given date. A tax increment district may exist for a period not to exceed [20] 25 years, unless an amendment is made to the project 20250HB0359PN1582 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plan under paragraph (8).* * *Section 9. Financing of project costs.* * *(d) Amount and term.--Tax increment bonds or notes may not be issued in an amount exceeding the aggregate project costs. The bonds or notes shall mature over a period not exceeding [20] 25 years from the date of issue. The principal and interest on the bonds and notes may be payable at any time and at any place. The bonds or notes may be payable to bearer or may be registered as to the principal or principal and interest. The bonds or notes may be in any denominations. The bonds or notes may be sold at public or private sale.* * *Section 3 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0359PN1582 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415